Nebraska, session 109, LB1262.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1262 LB1262
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 11 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Foreign Adversaries Out of Postsecondary Education Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds that:
(1) Institutions of postsecondary education play a vital role in
research, national competitiveness, development of future leaders, and
nurturing core American liberties, and should be catalysts of
strengthening ties with American allies who share our democratic values
rather than adversaries who exploit them;
(2) Section 117 of the Higher Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C.
1011f, requires American universities to report all foreign gifts, yet a
2020 United States Department of Education investigation found that
section 117 reporting is systemically underinclusive and inaccurate;
(3) In 2025, the United States House of Representatives passed HR
1048, which would amend section 117 to tighten up reporting requirements
for foreign gifts to American universities;
(4) The United States Department of Education maintains the Section
117 Foreign Gift and Contract Public Transparency Dashboard which lists
all foreign gifts to universities and lists Qatar and China as the first
and fourth largest contributors to U.S. universities, with Qatar
contributing two billion dollars more than any other country;
(5) Foreign governments and affiliated entities, particularly the
People's Republic of China, in part via the Confucius Institute network,
Qatar, in part via the Muslim Brotherhood network, as well as Russia,
Iran, and North Korea, have systematically utilized partnerships,
research sponsorships, media collaboration, funding mechanisms, student
clubs and other campus outreach efforts, and clandestine relationships to
exert ideological influence or intelligence collection within American
universities;
(6) Columbia University shuttered its Chinese Students and Scholars
Association chapter because of concerns the group was being used as a
tool of the People's Republic of China to carry out influence operations
-2-

LB1262 LB1262
2026 2026
on campus;
(7) The former President of Northwestern University admitted in 2025
testimony to Congressional investigators that Qatar's funding to
Northwestern came with the requirement that students and faculty at
Northwestern's Doha campus comply with Qatari penal code prohibitions
outlawing public criticism of Qatar's government and online postings
deemed harmful by the regime, and that mandatory antisemitism training
from Northwestern's main campus was not offered at its Qatar branch;
(8) Florida enacted legislation in 2023 to restrict postsecondary
education institutions from entering into agreements with or accepting
funding from countries of concern, Texas enacted legislation in 2025 to
prohibit acceptance of funding from governments of foreign adversaries,
and the governors of both Texas and Florida issued executive orders in
2025 designating the Muslim Brotherhood as a foreign terrorist
organization;
(9) In January 2026, the United States Department of the Treasury,
in coordination with the United States Department of State, designated
certain branches of the Muslim Brotherhood and the Lebanese Secretary
General of the Muslim Brotherhood as specially designated global
terrorists and foreign terrorist organizations;
(10) Campus safety and intellectual freedom can be at risk when
foreign adversaries directly or indirectly intimidate or influence
students and faculty through various means, including via aggressive
protests restricting access to campus facilities to those with certain
identities and views, and when campus informants send reports to
repressive foreign security agencies;
(11) There is a compelling state interest in protecting academic
independence, research security, and intellectual property from foreign
adversary influence; and
(12) A prohibition on acceptance of direct or indirect funding or
contractual benefits from designated foreign adversaries is necessary to
-3-

LB1262 LB1262
2026 2026
protect the sovereignty and interests of the state.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Foreign Adversaries Out of
Postsecondary Education Act:
(1) Affiliate organization means any foundation, research institute,
direct-support organization, or contracting entity formed for the benefit
of a postsecondary institution;
(2) Foreign adversary means:
(a) The People's Republic of China, including entities associated
with the Hanban, the Ministry of Education, or the Confucius Institutes;
(b) The Russian Federation;
(c) The Islamic Republic of Iran;
(d) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea;
(e) The state of Qatar, including the state-owned Al Jazeera Media
Network and the Qatar Foundation as well as Hamas and other affiliated
Muslim Brotherhood organizations or persons operating in this state,
including those under government patronage and protection;
(f) Any foreign terrorist organization or specially designated
global terrorists designated by the United States Department of State or
the United States Department of the Treasury, including key branches and
individuals of the Muslim Brotherhood;
(g) Any additional country, entity, or person designated by the
Governor pursuant to section 8 of this act; and
(h) Any agent or entity under control of or acting on behalf of such
foreign adversary;
(3) Foreign principal means any person or entity acting directly or
indirectly on behalf of a foreign adversary, including through a
subsidiary, nonprofit, or front organization;
(4) Gift, grant, contract, or funding means monetary contributions,
research sponsorships, in-kind support, subsidized travel, programmatic
assistance, or any type of value transfer;
(5) Knowingly means having actual knowledge or acting with
-4-

LB1262 LB1262
2026 2026
deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard of the Foreign Adversaries Out
of Postsecondary Education Act; and
(6) Postsecondary institution has the same meaning as in section
85-2403 and is inclusive of research divisions, laboratories, centers,
and grant-funded programs.
Sec. 4. (1) No postsecondary institution, or any affiliate
organization, may accept, solicit, or enter into, directly or indirectly,
a gift, grant, contract, or funding, a research sponsorship, a program
agreement, a partnership, or any other funding relationship with a
foreign adversary or foreign principal.
(2) Funds accepted in violation of this section shall be returned or
forfeited to the State Treasurer to be credited as required by Article
VII, section 7, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(3) Cultural exchange agreements are prohibited with a foreign
adversary or any entity controlled by a foreign adversary unless the
postsecondary institution certifies in writing to the Coordinating
Commission for Postsecondary Education that the agreement in no way
constrains freedom of speech, controls curricular materials, or promotes
an agenda detrimental to the safety of this state or the United States.
(4) No student or scholar association affiliated with or operating
at any postsecondary institution may coordinate activities with a foreign
adversary or any entity controlled by a foreign adversary. Any violation
of this prohibition shall result in the postsecondary institution ending
any affiliation with the student or scholar association.
Sec. 5. (1) Each postsecondary institution shall submit a report to
the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education for any contract
with or gift from a foreign country valued at ten thousand dollars or
more or with an aggregated value within a twelve-month period of fifty
thousand dollars or more. The report shall identify the donor, country of
origin, total value, date received, terms of any contract, purpose of any
gift, and outcome of any due diligence review. The report shall also
-5-

LB1262 LB1262
2026 2026
identify any stipulation regarding how or on what the funding may be
spent, including, but not limited to:
(a) Nondisclosure agreements;
(b) Hiring requirements, including, but not limited to, requirements
to hire specific individuals or individuals of specific nationalities or
specific religions;
(c) Requirements to enroll specific students or students from
specific countries or practicing specific religions;
(d) Requirements to discuss the foreign country in a positive manner
or to refrain from discussing the foreign country in a negative manner;
(e) Required actions regarding a foreign country or issues related
to a foreign country; or
(f) Requirements to allow certain student clubs or other activities
on campus or for such student clubs to receive school funding and
support.
(2) The submitted report shall also include a copy of any gift
agreement between the foreign source and the postsecondary institution,
which shall include any description of the purpose for which the gift is
to be used.
(3) The report shall be submitted within one month of receiving a
gift or entering into a contract in a searchable or sortable digital
format in compliance with the specifications of the Coordinating
Commission for Postsecondary Education.
(4) The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education shall
maintain a transparency database with the information required under this
section accessible to the public on the commission's website.
(5) Each postsecondary institution shall also comply with the
requirements of 20 U.S.C. 1011f.
Sec. 6. (1) Any institution or affiliate organization found to be
in violation of the Foreign Adversaries Out of Postsecondary Education
Act shall:
-6-

LB1262 LB1262
2026 2026
(a) Forfeit to the State Treasurer a sum equal to the prohibited
gift or contract value;
(b) Be ineligible for state-funded research grants for up to five
years; and
(c) Be subject to civil penalties of up to two hundred fifty
thousand dollars per violation.
(2) Any employee of a postsecondary institution who knowingly
conceals prohibited funding shall be subject to termination by the
postsecondary institution.
(3) An egregious violation may result in a postsecondary institution
losing its authorization to operate pursuant to the Postsecondary
Institution Act.
(4) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall annually inspect or audit a
random sample of at least ten percent of postsecondary institutions,
including postsecondary institutions that did not submit a disclosure
report under this section, to determine compliance with the requirements
of the Foreign Adversaries Out of Postsecondary Education Act.
(5) The Attorney General may commence a civil action in any
appropriate district court to enforce the provisions of this section.
(6) Any penalties collected under this section shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII,
section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska. Any forfeitures to the State
Treasurer under this section shall be paid into the permanent school fund
in accordance with Article VII, section 7, of the Constitution of
Nebraska.
Sec. 7. (1) No postsecondary institution may operate or host any
Confucius Institute or equivalent entity funded or supported by the
People's Republic of China or its affiliates.
(2) No postsecondary institution may host or employ any individual
faculty, staff, or student or operate or allow to operate any entity
funded by Qatar or its affiliates, including the state-owned Al Jazeera
-7-

LB1262 LB1262
2026 2026
Network, Qatar Foundation, Hamas, and other affiliated Muslim Brotherhood
organizations.
(3) Any program subject to this section shall be closed or
terminated on or before December 31, 2026, or when any existing contract
ends, whichever comes first.
Sec. 8. (1) The Governor, in consultation with the Attorney
General, may designate any additional country, entity, or person as a
foreign adversary or foreign principal for purposes of the Foreign
Adversaries Out of Postsecondary Education Act.
(2) Notice of any such designation shall be filed electronically
with the Clerk of the Legislature and the Coordinating Commission for
Postsecondary Education. The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education shall post any such notice on the commission's website.
(3) A postsecondary institution may petition the Governor for
reconsideration of such a designation.
(4) Any country, entity, or person designated as a foreign adversary
or foreign principal pursuant to this section may appeal such designation
to any appropriate district court.
Sec. 9. (1) In furtherance of the mandate to protect the state from
fraud, the Attorney General shall utilize all existing statutory powers
of investigation, including subpoena power and advanced investigative
tools, to monitor compliance with the Foreign Adversaries Out of
Postsecondary Education Act and to investigate any other attempts by
foreign adversaries or foreign principals to conceal funding, exert
ideological influence, or gather intelligence in the state. The Attorney
General shall ensure that the mechanisms for reporting potential abuse
include appropriate protections for whistleblowers and establish clear
internal guidelines for investigations to comply with state and federal
law.
(2) The Nebraska State Patrol, in consultation with the Governor and
the Attorney General, shall provide an educational module on how foreign
-8-

LB1262 LB1262
2026 2026
adversaries and foreign principals exploit America's open society to
infiltrate postsecondary institutions, including the use of direct
funding, front entities, and nonprofit charitable organizations. The
module shall train law enforcement officials to recognize and investigate
such efforts as well as best practices for protecting students and
teachers from repression, drawing upon relevant federal statutes and case
law.
(3) Every peace officer shall complete the educational module
provided under subsection (3) of this section at least once every three
years.
Sec. 10. On or before December 31 of each year, the Attorney
General, in collaboration with the Coordinating Commission for
Postsecondary Education and the Auditor of Public Accounts, shall
electronically submit to the Governor and the Clerk of the Legislature a
report summarizing investigations conducted related to the Foreign
Adversaries Out of Postsecondary Education Act. The report shall not
include any information that would compromise any ongoing investigations.
Sec. 11. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate to the
Nebraska State Patrol two hundred fifty thousand dollars annually for law
enforcement training and to the Attorney General two hundred fifty
thousand dollars annually for investigating potential violations of the
Foreign Adversaries Out of Postsecondary Education Act.
Sec. 12. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 13. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 14. The following section is outright repealed: Section
85-906, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025.
Sec. 15. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-9-